North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-310.4.
Public participation in the development of the remedial action plan.

Within 10 days after the Secretary issues a declaration pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.3

, he shall notify in writing the local board of health and the local health director having jurisdiction in the county or counties in which an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site is located that the
site may endanger the public health or environment and that a remedial action plan is being developed. The Secretary shall involve the local health director in the development of the remedial action plan.

Before approving any remedial action plan, the Secretary shall make copies of the proposed plan available for inspection as follows:

A copy of the plan shall be provided to the local health director.

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-180, s. 3, effective August 2, 2010.

A copy of the plan shall be provided to the public library located in closest proximity to the site in the county or counties in which the site is located.

The Secretary may place copies of the plan in other locations so as to assure the availability thereof to the public.In addition, copies of the plan shall be available for inspection and copying at cost by the public during regular business hours in the
offices of the agency within the Department with responsibility for the administration of the remedial action program.

Before approving any remedial action plan, the Secretary shall give notice of the proposed plan as follows:

A notice and summary of the proposed plan shall be published weekly for a period of three consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the county or counties where the site is located.

Notice that a proposed remedial action plan has been developed shall be given by first class mail to persons who have requested such notice. Such notice shall state the locations where a copy of the remedial action plan is available for inspection. The
Department shall maintain a mailing list of persons who request notice pursuant to this section.

The Secretary may conduct a public meeting to explain the proposed plan and alternatives to the public.

At least 45 days from the latest date on which notice is provided pursuant to subsection (c)(1) of this section shall be allowed for the receipt of written comment on the proposed remedial action plan prior to its approval. If a public hearing is held
pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, at least 20 days will be allowed for receipt of written comment following the hearing prior to the approval of the remedial action plan.

If the Secretary determines that significant public interest exists, he shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed plan and alternatives. The Department shall give notice of the hearing at least 30 days prior to the date thereof by:

Publication as provided in subdivision (c)(1) of this section, with first publication to occur not less than 30 days prior to the scheduled date of the hearing; and

First class mail to persons who have requested notice as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section.

The Commission shall adopt rules prescribing the form and content of the notices required by this section. The proposed remedial action plan shall include a summary of all alternatives considered in the development of the plan. A record shall be maintained
of all comment received by the Department regarding the remedial action plan.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1997-28, s. 2; 2010-180, s. 3; 2014-122, s. 11(g).

§ 130A-310.5.
Authority of the Secretary with respect to sites which pose an imminent hazard.

An imminent hazard exists whenever the Secretary determines, that there exists a condition caused by an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site, including a release or a substantial threat of a release into the environment of a hazardous substance
from the site, which is causing serious harm to the public health or environment, or which is likely to cause such harm before a remedial action plan can be developed. Whenever the Secretary determines that an imminent hazard exists
he may, in addition to any other powers he may have, without notice or hearing, order any known responsible party to take immediately any action necessary to eliminate or correct the condition, or the Secretary, in his discretion,
may take such action without issuing an order. Written notice of any order issued pursuant to this section shall be provided to all persons subject to the order as set out in G.S. 130A-310.3(c). Unless the time required to do so
would increase the harm to the public health or the environment, the Secretary shall solicit the cooperation of responsible parties prior to the entry of any such order. The provisions of subdivisions (1) to (3) of G.S. 130A-310.6(a)
shall apply to any action taken by the Secretary pursuant to this section, and any such action shall be considered part of a remedial action program, the cost of which may be recovered from any responsible party.

If a person violates the requirements or schedules in an order issued pursuant to this section, the Secretary may institute an action for injunctive relief, irrespective of all other remedies at law, in the superior court of the county where the violation
occurred or where a defendant resides.

The cost of any action by the Secretary pursuant to this section may be paid from the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund, or the Emergency Response Fund established pursuant to

G.S. 130A-306

, subject to a later action for reimbursement pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.7

.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1989, c. 286, s. 4; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 9; c. 1024, s. 30(a); 1991, c. 342, s. 8.

§ 130A-310.6.
State action upon default of responsible parties or when no responsible party can be located.

Whenever a person ordered to develop and implement an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site remedial action program is unable or fails to do so within the time specified in the order, the Secretary may develop and implement or cause to be
developed and implemented such a program. The cost of developing and implementing a remedial action program pursuant to this section may be paid from the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund, subject to a later action for reimbursement
pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.7

.

The Department is authorized and empowered to use any staff, equipment or materials under its control or provided by other cooperating federal, State or local agencies and to contract with any agent or contractor it deems appropriate to develop and implement
the remedial action program. State agencies shall provide to the maximum extent feasible such staff, equipment, and materials as may be available for developing and implementing a remedial action program.

Upon completion of any inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal remedial action program, any State or local agency that has provided personnel, equipment, or material shall deliver to the Department a record of expenses incurred by the agency. The
amount of the incurred expenses shall be disbursed by the Secretary to each such agency. The Secretary shall keep a record of all expenses incurred for the services of State personnel and for the use of the State’s equipment
and material.

As soon as feasible or after completion of any inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site remedial action program, the Secretary shall prepare a statement of all expenses and costs of the program expended by the State and issue an order demanding
payment from responsible parties. Written notice of such an order shall be provided to all persons subject to the order personally or by certified mail. If given by certified mail, notice shall be deemed to have been given
on the date appearing on the return of the receipt. If giving of notice cannot be accomplished either personally or by certified mail, notice shall then be given as provided in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j).

If the Secretary, after declaring that an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site may endanger the public health or the environment, is unable, after making a reasonable attempt, to locate any responsible party, the Department may develop
and implement a remedial action program for the site as provided in subsection (a)(1) and (2) of this section. If responsible parties are subsequently located, the Secretary may issue an order demanding payment from such persons
in the manner set forth in subdivision (a)(3) of this section for the necessary expenses incurred by the Department for developing and implementing the remedial action program. If the persons subject to such an order refuse to
pay the sum expended, or fail to pay such sum within the time specified in the order, the Secretary shall bring an action in the manner set forth in

G.S. 130A-310.7

.

The Secretary shall use funds allocated to the Department under

G.S. 130A-295.9

to assess pre-1983 landfills, to determine the priority for remediation of pre-1983 landfills, and to develop and implement a remedial action plan for each pre-1983 landfill that requires remediation. Environmental
and human health risks posed by a pre-1983 landfill may be mitigated using a risk-based approach for assessment and remediation. The Secretary shall develop a program to permit owners of property containing a pre-1983 landfill
to suspend the further application of requirements of the program authorized by this subsection for as long as the owner continues to own the property if the owner complies with all of the following requirements:

The property owner signs an assumption of liability agreement agreeing to accept all liability for potential on-site and off-site impacts caused by the pre-1983 landfill.

The property owner provides financial assurance for any future impacts. The Department shall set the financial assurance requirement in a reasonable manner based on the information on current site conditions and historical disposal records or other information
provided by the property owner. The requirement for financial assurance of this subdivision shall not apply where (i) the pre-1983 landfill served as the municipal landfill for a unit of local government and (ii) the unit
of local government provided no financial compensation for the waste disposal to the owner of the landfill site.

The Secretary shall not seek cost recovery from a unit of local government for assessment and remedial action performed under subsection (c) of this section at a pre-1983 landfill. The Secretary shall not seek cost recovery for assessment and remedial
action performed under subsection (c) of this section at a pre-1983 landfill from any other potentially responsible party if the Secretary develops and implements a remedial action plan for that pre-1983 landfill. If any potentially
responsible party fails to cooperate with assessment of a site and implementation of control and mitigation measures at any site which the potentially responsible party owns or over which the potentially responsible party exercises
control through a lease or other property interest, the Secretary may seek cost recovery for assessment and remedial action. Cooperation with assessment of a site and implementation of control and mitigation measures includes,
but is not limited to, granting access to the site, allowing installation of monitoring wells, allowing installation and maintenance of improvements to the landfill cap, allowing installation of security measures, agreeing to record
and implement land-use restrictions, and providing access to any records regarding the pre-1983 landfill. Nothing in this section shall alter any right, duty, obligation, or liability between a unit of local government and a third
party. Nothing in this section shall alter any right, duty, obligation, or liability between any other potentially responsible party and a unit of local government, a third party, or, except as provided in this subsection, to the
State.

The Secretary shall develop and implement remedial action plans for pre-1983 landfills in the order of their priority determined as provided in subsection (c) of this section. The Secretary shall not develop or implement a remedial action plan for a pre-1983
landfill unless the Secretary determines that sufficient funds will be available from the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund to pay the costs of development and implementation of a remedial action plan for that pre-1983 landfill.

A unit of local government that voluntarily undertakes assessment or remediation of a pre-1983 landfill may request that the Department reimburse the costs of assessment of the pre-1983 landfill and implementation of measures necessary to remediate the
site to eliminate an imminent hazard. The Department shall provide reimbursement under this subsection if the Department finds all of the following:

The unit of local government undertakes assessment and remediation under a plan approved by the Department.

The unit of local government provides a certified accounting of costs incurred for assessment and remediation.

Each contract for assessment and remediation complies with the requirements of Articles 3D and 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

Remedial action is limited to measures necessary to abate the imminent hazard.

The Department may undertake any additional action necessary to remediate a pre-1983 landfill based on the priority ranking of the site under subsection (c) of this section.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1989, c. 286, s. 5; 2007-550, s. 14(c); 2017-57, s. 13.4(a).

§ 130A-310.7.
Action for reimbursement; liability of responsible parties; notification of completed remedial action.

Notwithstanding any other provision or rule of law, and subject only to the defenses set forth in this subsection, any person who:

Discharges or deposits; or

Contracts or arranges for any discharge or deposit; or

Accepts for discharge or deposit; or

Transports or arranges for transport for the purpose of discharge or deposit

any hazardous substance, the result of which discharge or deposit is the existence of an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site, shall be considered a responsible party. Neither an innocent landowner who is a bona fide purchaser of the inactive
hazardous substance or waste disposal site without knowledge or without a reasonable basis for knowing that hazardous substance or waste disposal had occurred nor a person whose interest or ownership in the inactive
hazardous substance or waste disposal site is based on or derived from a security interest in the property shall be considered a responsible party. A responsible party shall be directly liable to the State for any or
all of the reasonably necessary expenses of developing and implementing a remedial action program for such site. The Secretary shall bring an action for reimbursement of the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund in
the name of the State in the superior court of the county in which the site is located to recover such sum and the cost of bringing the action. The State must show that a danger to the public health or the environment
existed and that the State complied with the provisions of this Part.

There shall be no liability under this section for a person who can establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the danger to the public health or the environment caused by the site was caused solely by:

An act of God; or

An act of war; or

An intentional act or omission of a third party (but this defense shall not be available if the act or omission is that of an employee or agent of the defendant, or if the act or omission occurs in connection with a contractual relationship with the defendant);
or

Any combination of the above causes.

(b1)
Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, there shall be no liability under this section for a person who arranges for recycling of recyclable materials with respect to such materials if that person
has complied with all standards, requirements, and criteria set forth in the Superfund Recycling Equity Act of 1999, 42 U.S.C. § 9627, as amended.

The definitions set out in

G.S. 130A-310.31(b)

apply to this subsection. Any person may submit a written request to the Department for a determination that a site that is subject to this Part has been remediated to unrestricted use standards as provided in Part
5 of Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes. A request for a determination that a site has been remediated to unrestricted use standards shall be accompanied by the fee required by G.S. 130A-310.39(a)(2). If the Department
determines that the site has been remediated to unrestricted use standards, the Department shall issue a written notification that no further remediation will be required at the site. The notification shall state that no further
remediation will be required at the site unless the Department later determines, based on new information or information not previously provided to the Department, that the site has not been remediated to unrestricted use standards
or that the Department was provided with false or incomplete information. Under any of those circumstances, the Department may withdraw the notification and require responsible parties to remediate the site to unrestricted use
standards.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1989, c. 286, s. 6; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 10; c. 1024, s. 30(b); 1997-357, s. 5; 2001-384, s. 11; 2017-163, s. 1.

§ 130A-310.8.
Recordation of notices of environmental contamination and notices of restricted use.

After determination by the Department of the location and general extent of contamination of an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site, the owner of the real property on which the site is located, within 90 days after official notice to the
owner to do so, shall submit to the Department a survey plat of areas designated by the Department that has been prepared and certified by a professional land surveyor, and entitled “NOTICE OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONTAMINATION.” If the
Notice is submitted pursuant to a remedial action plan approved by the Department for the property, the Notice may be entitled “NOTICE OF RESTRICTED USE.” Where an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site is located
on more than one parcel or tract of land, a composite map or plat showing all parcels or tracts may be recorded. The Notice shall include a legal description of the site that would be sufficient as a description in an instrument
of conveyance, shall meet the requirements of

G.S. 47-30

for maps and plats, and shall identify:

The location of areas exceeding unrestricted use standards as defined in

G.S. 130A-310.65

with respect to permanently surveyed benchmarks.

The type, location, and quantity of hazardous substances known to exist on the site.

Any restrictions approved by the Department on the current or future use of the site.

After the Department approves and certifies the Notice, the owner of the site shall file the certified copy of the Notice in the register of deeds’ office in the county or counties in which the land is located within 15 days of the date on which the owner
receives approval of the Notice from the Department.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.18, effective July 1, 2012.

In the event that the owner of the site fails to submit and file the Notice required by this section within the time specified, the Secretary may prepare and file such Notice. The costs thereof may be recovered by the Secretary from any responsible party.
In the event that an owner of a site who is not a responsible party submits and files the Notice required by this section, he may recover the reasonable costs thereof from any responsible party.

When property that contains, or is a portion of, an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site is sold, leased, conveyed, or transferred, the deed or other instrument of transfer shall contain in the description section, in no smaller type than
that used in the body of the deed or instrument, a statement that hazardous substances are present in environmental media at the property and, if applicable, that the property has been remediated under this Part with the approval
of the Department by use of land use controls and shall reference by book and page the recordation of the Notice.

A Notice of Environmental Contamination or Notice of Restricted Use filed pursuant to this section may, at the request of the owner of the land, be cancelled by the Secretary after the hazards have been eliminated. If requested in writing by the owner
of the land and if the Secretary concurs with the request, the Secretary shall send to the register of deeds of each county where the Notice is recorded a statement that the hazards have been eliminated and request that the Notice
be cancelled of record. The Secretary’s statement shall contain the names of the owners of the land as shown in the Notice and reference the plat book and page where the Notice is recorded.

Recordation under this section is not required for any inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site that is undergoing voluntary remedial action pursuant to this Part unless the Secretary determines that either:

A concentration of a hazardous substance or hazardous waste that poses a danger to public health or the environment will remain following implementation of the voluntary remedial action program.

The voluntary remedial action program is not being implemented in a manner satisfactory to the Secretary and in compliance with the agreement between the Secretary and the owner, operator, or other responsible party.

The Secretary may waive recordation under this section with respect to any residential real property that is contaminated solely because a hazardous substance or hazardous waste migrated to the property from other property by means of groundwater flow
if disclosure of the contamination is required under Chapter 47E of the General Statutes. An owner of residential real property whose recordation requirement is waived by the Secretary under this subsection and who fails to disclose
contamination as required by Chapter 47E of the General Statutes is subject to both the penalties and remedies under this Chapter applicable to a person who fails to comply with the recordation requirements of this section as though
those requirements had not been waived and to the remedies available under Chapter 47E of the General Statutes.

If a site subject to the requirements of this section is remediated pursuant to the requirements of Part 8 of Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes, a Notice of Restricted Use may be prepared and filed in accordance with G.S. 130A-310.71(e)
in lieu of a Notice of Residual Contamination.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(34); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 19(b); 1997-394, s. 2; 1997-443, ss. 11A.119(a), (b); 1997-528, s. 1; 2012-18, s. 1.18; 2015-286, s. 4.7(c); 2021-158, s. 7(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.18, effective July 1, 2012, deleted subsection (c), regarding the register of deeds recording and indexing the copy of the notice; and deleted the last three sentences of subsection (f).

Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.7(c), effective October 22, 2015, added subsection (i).

Session Laws 2021-158, s. 7(a), effective September 16, 2021, rewrote the section head and subsections (a), (e), and (i); and substituted “A Notice of Environmental Contamination or Notice of Restricted Use” for “A Notice of Inactive Hazardous Substance
or Waste Disposal Site” at the beginning of subsection (f).

§ 130A-310.9.
Voluntary remedial actions; limitation of liability; agreements; implementation and oversight by private engineering and consulting firms.

No one owner, operator, or other responsible party who voluntarily participates in the implementation of a remedial action program under

G.S. 130A-310.3

or

G.S. 130A-310.5

may be required to pay in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the cost of implementing a remedial action program at a single inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site. The owner, operator, or
other responsible party who voluntarily participates in the implementation of a remedial action program under

G.S. 130A-310.3

or

G.S. 130A-310.5

shall be required to pay in addition to the cost of implementing the remedial action program a fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) to be used for the Department’s cost of monitoring and enforcing the remedial action
program. The limitation of liability contained in this subsection applies to the cost of implementing the program and to the fee under this subsection. The limitation of liability contained in this subsection does not apply to
the cost of developing the remedial action plan.

The Secretary may enter into an agreement with an owner, operator, or other responsible party that provides for implementation of a voluntary remedial action program in accordance with a remedial action plan approved by the Department. Investigations,
evaluations, and voluntary remedial actions are subject to the provisions of

G.S. 130A-310.1(c)

, 130A-310.1(d), 130A-310.3(d), 130A-310.3(f), 130A-310.5, 130A-310.8, and any other requirement imposed by the Department. A voluntary remedial action and all documents that relate to the voluntary remedial action
shall be fully subject to inspection and audit by the Department. At least 30 days prior to entering into any agreement providing for the implementation of a voluntary remedial action program, the Secretary shall mail notice of
the proposed agreement as provided in G.S. 130A-310.4(c)(2). Sites undergoing voluntary remedial actions shall be so identified as a separate category in the inventory of sites maintained pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.1

but shall not be included on the Inactive Hazardous Waste Sites Priority List required by

G.S. 130A-310.2

.

The Department may approve a private environmental consulting and engineering firm to implement and oversee a voluntary remedial action by an owner, operator, or other responsible party. An owner, operator, or other responsible party who enters into an
agreement with the Secretary to implement a voluntary remedial action may hire a private environmental consulting or engineering firm approved by the Department to implement and oversee the voluntary remedial action. A voluntary
remedial action that is implemented and overseen by a private environmental consulting or engineering firm shall be implemented in accordance with all federal and State laws, regulations, and rules that apply to remedial actions
generally and is subject to rules adopted pursuant to G.S. 130A-310.12(b). The Department may revoke its approval of the oversight of a voluntary remedial action by a private environmental consulting or engineering firm and assume
direct oversight of the voluntary remedial action whenever it appears to the Department that the voluntary remedial action is not being properly implemented or is not being adequately overseen. The Department may require the owner,
operator, other responsible party, or private environmental consulting or engineering firm to take any action necessary to bring the voluntary remedial action into compliance with applicable requirements.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1989, c. 286, s. 7; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 598, s. 1; 1995, c. 327, s. 2; 1997-394, s. 3; 2007-107, s. 1.1(g); 2009-451, s. 13.3C(a).

§ 130A-310.10.
Annual reports.

The Secretary shall include in the status of solid waste management report required to be submitted pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.06(c) a report on inactive hazardous sites that includes at least the following:

The Inactive Hazardous Waste Sites Priority List.

A list of remedial action plans requiring State funding through the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund.

A comprehensive budget to implement these remedial action plans and the adequacy of the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund to fund the cost of these plans.

A prioritized list of sites that are eligible for remedial action under CERCLA/SARA together with recommended remedial action plans and a comprehensive budget to implement these plans. The budget for implementing a remedial action plan under CERCLA/SARA
shall include a statement as to any appropriation that may be necessary to pay the State’s share of the plan.

A list of sites and remedial action plans undergoing voluntary cleanup with Departmental approval.

A list of sites and remedial action plans that may require State funding, a comprehensive budget if implementation of these possible remedial action plans is required, and the adequacy of the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund to fund the possible
costs of these plans.

A list of sites that pose an imminent hazard.

A comprehensive budget to develop and implement remedial action plans for sites that pose imminent hazards and that may require State funding, and the adequacy of the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund.

(8a)
Repealed by Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.7(f), effective October 22, 2015.

Any other information requested by the General Assembly or the Environmental Review Commission.

(a1)
On or before April 15 of each year, the Department shall report to each member of the General Assembly who has an inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site in the member’s district. This report
shall include the location of each inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site in the member’s district, the type and amount of hazardous substances or waste known or believed to be located on each of these
sites, the last action taken at each of these sites, and the date of that last action. The Department shall include this information in the status of solid waste management report required to be submitted pursuant to
G.S. 130A-309.06(c).

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-452, s. 2.3, effective October 28, 2001.

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1989, c. 286, s. 8; 1997-28, s. 1; 2001-452, s. 2.3; 2010-31, s. 13.9(b); 2011-186, s. 4; 2012-200, s. 22; 2015-286, s. 4.7(f); 2017-10, s. 4.14(d); 2020-74, s. 11(g); 2020-78, s. 7.2(g).

§ 130A-310.11.
Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund created.

There is established under the control and direction of the Department the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund. This fund shall be a revolving fund consisting of any monies appropriated for such purpose by the General Assembly or available to it from
grants, taxes, and other monies paid to it or recovered by or on behalf of the Department. The Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund shall be treated as a nonreverting special trust fund pursuant to

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

, except that interest and other income received on the Fund balance shall be treated as set forth in G.S. 147-69.1(d).

Funds credited to the Inactive Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund pursuant to

G.S. 130A-295.9

shall be used only as provided in

G.S. 130A-295.9

(1) and G.S. 130A-310.6(c).

History.
1987, c. 574, s. 2; 1989, c. 286, s. 9; 2007-550, s. 14(d); 2009-484, s. 11; 2010-142, s. 12; 2014-100, s. 14.21(i).

§ 130A-310.12.
Administrative procedure; adoption of rules.

The provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes apply to this Part. The Commission shall adopt rules for the implementation of this Part.

The Commission shall adopt rules governing the selection and use of private environmental consulting and engineering firms to implement and oversee voluntary remedial actions by owners, operators, or other responsible parties under G.S. 130A-310.9(c).
Rules adopted under this subsection shall specify:

Standards applicable to private environmental consulting and engineering firms.

Criteria and procedures for approval of firms by the Department.

Requirements and procedures under which the Department monitors and audits a voluntary remedial action to ensure that the voluntary remedial action complies with applicable federal and State law, regulations, and under which the owner, operator, or other
responsible party reimburses the Department for the cost of monitoring and auditing the voluntary remedial action.

Any financial assurances that may be required of an owner, operator, or other responsible party.

Requirements for the preparation, maintenance, and public availability of work plans and records, reports of data collection including sampling, sample analysis, and other site testing, and other records and reports that are consistent with the requirements
applicable to remedial actions generally.

History.
1987, c. 574, ss. 2, 5; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 598, s. 2; 1995, c. 327, s. 3.

§ 130A-310.13.
Short title.

This Part shall be known and may be cited as the Inactive Hazardous Sites Response Act of 1987.

History.
1991, c. 281, s. 3.

§§ 130A-310.14 through 130A-310.19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Superfund Program.

§ 130A-310.20.
Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following definitions shall apply throughout this Part:

“CERCLA/SARA” or “Superfund” means the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, Pub. L. No. 96-510, 94 Stat. 2767, 42 U.S.C. § 9601 et seq., as amended, and the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986,
Pub. L. No. 99-499, 100 Stat. 1613, as amended.

History.
1989, c. 286, s. 10.

§ 130A-310.21.
Administration of the Superfund program.

The Department shall maintain an appropriate administrative subunit within the solid waste management unit authorized by

G.S. 130A-291

to carry out those activities in which the State is authorized to engage under CERCLA/SARA.

History.
1989, c. 286, s. 10.

§ 130A-310.22.
Contracts authorized.

The Department is authorized to enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with the United States and to engage in any activity otherwise authorized by law to identify, investigate, evaluate, and clean up any site or facility covered by CERCLA/SARA
including but not limited to performing preliminary assessments, site investigations, remedial investigations, and feasibility studies; preparation of records of decision; conducting emergency response, remedial, and removal actions;
and engaging in enforcement activities in accordance with the provisions of CERCLA/SARA.

The Department may make all assurances required by federal law or regulation including but not limited to assuring that the State will assume responsibility for the operation and maintenance of any remedial action for the anticipated duration of the remedial
action; assuring that the State will provide its share of the cost of any remedial action at a site or facility which was privately owned or operated; assuring that the State will provide its share of the cost of any removal, remedial
planning, and remedial action at a site or facility owned or operated by the State or a political subdivision of the State; assuring the availability of off-site treatment, storage, or disposal capacity needed to effectuate a remedial
action; assuring that the State will take title to, acquire an interest in, or accept transfer of any interest in real property needed to effectuate a remedial action; assuring that the State has adequate capacity to meet the assurances
required by CERCLA/SARA (42 U.S.C. § 9604(c)(9)); assuring access to the facility and any adjacent property including the securing of any right-of-way or easement needed to effectuate a remedial action; and assuring that the State
will satisfy all federal, State, and local requirements for permits and approvals necessary to effectuate a remedial action.

Each contract entered into by the Department under this section shall stipulate that all obligations of the State are subject to the availability of funds. Neither this section nor any contract entered into under authority of this section shall be construed
to obligate the General Assembly to make any appropriation to implement this Part or any contract entered into under this section. The Department shall implement this Part and any contract entered into under this section from funds
otherwise available or appropriated to the Department for such purpose.

History.
1989, c. 286, s. 10; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 11; c. 1024, s. 30(c).

§ 130A-310.23.
Filing notices of CERCLA/SARA (Superfund) liens.

Notices of liens and certificates of notices affecting liens for obligations payable to the United States under CERCLA/SARA (Superfund) (42 U.S.C. § 9607(l)) shall be filed in accordance with Article 11A of Chapter 44 of the General Statutes.

History.
1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1047, s. 1.1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 890, s. 11.

§§ 130A-310.24 through 130A-310.29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. Brownfields Property Reuse Act.

§ 130A-310.30.
Short title.

This Part may be cited as The Brownfields Property Reuse Act of 1997.

History.
1997-357, s. 2.